Xinkan.lexc
Multichar_Symbols
!=========!
!==VERBS==!
!=========!

!Flags for verbs
@U.TV.NO@
@U.TV.YES@
@U.NOM.YES@
@U.NOM.NO@
@U.COMP.YES@
@U.COMP.NO@
@U.ActIV.YES@
@U.ActIV.NO@
@U.Pref.YES@
@U.Pref.NO@
@U.VERB.YES@
@U.VERB.NO@
@U.DERIV.YES@
@U.DERIV.NO@
@U.CIRCUM.YES@
@U.CIRCUM.NO@

!=Agreement for verbs=!
!SETA
-1sg.comp -2sg.comp -3sg.comp -1pl.comp -2pl.comp -3pl.comp
-n' -ka' -y' -k -ka'% ay -y'% ay% %(lhik%)

!SETB for nouns and verbs
1sg 2sg 3sg 1pl 2pl 3pl
ɨn- ka- mu- muk- ay

!SetB Functions
.subj .poss

!SetC and D
1sg- 2sg- 3sg- 1pl- 2pl- 3pl-
!SetC (all of SetB except for 3sg and 3pl forms)
%0-
!SetD (add of SetB except for 3sg and 3pl forms)
a-

!Aspect for verbs
.comp .incomp .vn -imp.iv
-y'a 

!IVClassmarkers
-act -aff
-lha' -'

!Ghost Tags for IVs
%{NC%} %{AFF%}

!=========!
!==NOUNS==!
!=========!

!Flags for Nouns
@U.ALIEN.YES@
@U.ALIEN.NO@
@U.DIM.YES@
@U.DIM.NO@
@U.VAR.YES@
@U.VAR.NO@

!SetE = similar to Set A except 3sg and 3pl forms
-1sg.poss -2sg.poss -3sg.poss -1pl.poss -2pl.poss -2pl.poss
-h -h% lhik

!Number
%{F%}

!==============!
!==ADJECTIVES==!
!==============!

!Flags for adjective possession
@U.ADJ.YES@
@U.ADJ.NO@

!Orthographic symbols
ch
ch'
ts'
l'
k'
p'
t'
w'
r'
n'
m'
y'

LEXICON Root
@U.VERB.NO@   Nouns ;
@U.VERB.YES@ Verbs ;
@U.ALIEN.NO@ Adpositions ; ! Found in Seperate lexc files
@U.ALIEN.NO@@U.ADJ.YES@ Adjectives ; ! Found in Seperate lexc files
    Pronominals ; ! Found in Seperate lexc files
    Particles ; ! Found in Seperate lexc files

LEXICON Verbs ! Found in Seperate lexc files
    Intransitive ;
    Transitive ;

LEXICON Nouns ! Found in Seperate lexc files
    Diminutive ;
@U.VAR.NO@@U.ALIEN.YES@ Alienable ;
@U.VAR.NO@@U.ALIEN.NO@ Inalienable ;
@U.VAR.YES@    Variable ;

! Affixes found in a seperate lexc file
! The complete template for TV verbs. There are 3 inflectional stems (3 paradigms)
! Bare = VN, ICOMP, COMP
! Inflected = SETB-VN, COMP-SETA, SETB-INCOMP
! Overgenerating

LEXICON Transitive
@U.TV.YES@  SetB ;
@U.TV.YES@  TVstems ;

LEXICON TVstems
xuka Aspect ;

LEXICON Aspect
@U.DIM.NO@@U.Pref.NO@@U.NOM.NO@@U.TV.YES@.comp:@U.DIM.NO@@U.Pref.NO@@U.NOM.NO@@U.TV.YES@ SetA ; !TV completive
@U.DIM.NO@@U.Pref.NO@@U.NOM.NO@@U.TV.YES@ TVImperative ; !TV imperative
@U.DIM.NO@@U.NOM.NO@@U.TV.NO@@U.ActIV.YES@@U.COMP.YES@.comp:@U.DIM.NO@@U.NOM.NO@@U.TV.NO@@U.ActIV.YES@@U.COMP.YES@ IVclassmarker ; ! ActIV completive
@U.DIM.NO@@U.NOM.NO@@U.TV.NO@@U.ActIV.NO@@U.COMP.YES@.comp:@U.DIM.NO@@U.NOM.NO@@U.TV.NO@@U.ActIV.NO@@U.COMP.YES@%{AFF%} IVclassmarker ; ! AffIV completive
@U.DIM.NO@@U.NOM.NO@@U.TV.NO@@U.ActIV.NO@@U.COMP.NO@.incomp:@U.DIM.NO@@U.NOM.NO@@U.TV.NO@@U.ActIV.NO@@U.COMP.NO@ IVclassmarker; ! AffIV incompletive
@U.DIM.NO@@U.Pref.NO@@U.NOM.NO@@U.TV.NO@@U.COMP.NO@.incomp:@U.DIM.NO@@U.Pref.NO@@U.NOM.NO@@U.TV.NO@@U.COMP.NO@ IVImperative; ! AffIV incompletive
@U.DIM.NO@@U.NOM.NO@@U.ActIV.YES@@U.COMP.NO@.incomp:@U.DIM.NO@@U.NOM.NO@@U.ActIV.YES@@U.COMP.NO@%{NC%} Personcircumfixes ; !ActIV and TV incompletive
@U.DIM.NO@@U.NOM.YES@.vn:@U.DIM.NO@@U.NOM.YES@%{NC%} Personcircumfixes ;
@U.DIM.NO@@U.NOM.NO@@U.TV.YES@-contr:@U.DIM.NO@@U.NOM.NO@@U.TV.YES@-lhan' Personcircumfixes ;


LEXICON Intransitive
@U.NOM.YES@@U.TV.NO@ SetB ;
@U.COMP.YES@ SetC ;
@U.COMP.NO@ SetD ;
 IVclass ;

LEXICON IVclass 
@U.TV.NO@@U.ActIV.YES@ ActIVroots ;
@U.TV.NO@@U.ActIV.NO@ AffIVroots ;

LEXICON ActIVroots
mɨka Aspect ;

LEXICON AffIVroots
yana Aspect ;
!Complete Template for Alienable Nouns. There are 2 sizes, 2 numbers, and optional possession (2) = 8 forms total

LEXICON Alienable
@U.TV.NO@@U.VERB.NO@ SetB ;
    ANsubclasses ;

LEXICON ANsubclasses
    Count ;
    Mass ;

LEXICON Count
huurak Endings ;
ts'oko Endings ;
miya Endings ;
peelo' Endings ;
xuxi Endings ;
kɨɨʃa Endings ;

LEXICON Mass
uy Endings ;
wati Endings ;
ɬɨwɨ Endings ;

LEXICON Endings
@U.DERIV.NO@ Number ;
@U.DERIV.YES@@U.DIM.NO@ IntransitiveDERIV ;
!Complete Template for Inalienable Nouns. There are 2 sizes, 2 numbers, and optional possession (2) = 8 forms total

LEXICON Inalienable
    IANstems ;
    Proper ;

LEXICON IANstems 
nuuru Number ;
paama Number ;
uʃti Number ;
nawak'u Number ;
lak'uwa Number ;
ay'a Number ;
naru Number ;

LEXICON Proper
Hwan # ;
Tuuru' # ;
Sipani # ;

!Complete Template for Variable Nouns. There are 2 sizes, 2 numbers, and 2 forms of optional possession = 12 forms total

LEXICON Variable
@U.TV.NO@ SetB ;
    VariableNstems ;

LEXICON VariableNstems 
mɨn'a Number ;!Complete Template for Adjectives. There are 1 stem and 1 possession (only 3sg) = 2 forms total
!Also two types of quantifiers

LEXICON Adjectives
    Adjectivestems ;
    Quantifiers ;

LEXICON Adjectivestems
ts'ama AdjEndings ;
ɨran AdjEndings ;
hawa AdjEndings ;
pari AdjEndings ;
mɨr'a AdjEndings ;
pɨts'a AdjEndings ;
iipan AdjEndings ;
haya AdjEndings ;
chɨrɨkɨ AdjEndings ;

LEXICON AdjEndings
    SetE ;

LEXICON Quantifiers
    Numerals ;
    Abstract ;

LEXICON Numerals 
ik'alh # ;
piy' # ;
walh # ;
hirya # ;
pɨhɨ # ;
ta'alh  # ; 


LEXICON Abstract
tumuki' # ;
teena' # ;
kɨtɨk # ;
yaalha' # ;
puulha' # ;
puy # ;
hin # ;
!Complete Template for Adpositios Nouns. There are 1 stems and 1 possession = 2 forms total

LEXICON Adpositions
alh SetE ;
ʃa SetE ;
neelha SetE ;
hiná SetE ;
ʃam'a SetE ;
par'a SetE ;
ɨɨlɨ SetE ;
huuʃi SetE ;
ti'i SetE ;
'i SetE ;
kiki SetE ;
!Complete list of all the uninflectable words. 2 types.

LEXICON Particles
    Nominalparticles ;
    Verbalparticles ;

LEXICON Nominalparticles
kumu # ;
ki' # ;
na # ;

LEXICON Verbalparticles
pe' # ;
wa # ;
wan # ;
i # ;
pero # ;
o # ;
palh # ;
nalh # ;
!Complete list of pronominal elements 3 types.

LEXICON Pronominals
    Interrogative ;
    Personal ;
    Demonstratives ;
    Determiners ;

LEXICON Interrogative
ka(a)ta # ;
weena # ;
handa' # ;
han # ;
han% alhi # ;
lhɨkɨ # ;
iwalh # ;

LEXICON Personal
nen' # ;
naka # ;
nah # ;
neelhek # ;
neelhak(ay) # ;
naka(ay) # ;
naalik # ;

LEXICON Demonstratives
man # ;
hɨ' # ;

LEXICON Determiners
na # ; 
k'alh # ;! Verb and Noun head-marking

LEXICON SetA
@U.Pref.NO@-1sg.comp:@U.Pref.NO@-n' # ;
@U.Pref.NO@-2sg.comp:@U.Pref.NO@-ka' # ;
@U.Pref.NO@-3sg.comp:@U.Pref.NO@-y' # ;
@U.Pref.NO@-1pl.comp:@U.Pref.NO@-k # ;
@U.Pref.NO@-2pl.comp:@U.Pref.NO@-ka'% ay # ;
@U.Pref.NO@-3pl.comp:@U.Pref.NO@-y'% ay% %(lhik%) # ;
# ;

LEXICON SetB ! possession for all verbal nouns and alienable nouns and tv incompletive
@U.Pref.YES@@U.CIRCUM.NO@1sg:@U.Pref.YES@@U.CIRCUM.NO@ɨn- SetBFunction ;
@U.Pref.YES@@U.CIRCUM.NO@2sg:@U.Pref.YES@@U.CIRCUM.NO@ka'- SetBFunction ;
@U.Pref.YES@@U.CIRCUM.NO@3sg:@U.Pref.YES@@U.CIRCUM.NO@mu- SetBFunction ;
@U.Pref.YES@@U.CIRCUM.NO@1pl:@U.Pref.YES@@U.CIRCUM.NO@muk- SetBFunction ;
@U.Pref.YES@@U.CIRCUM.YES@2pl:@U.Pref.YES@@U.CIRCUM.YES@ka- SetBFunction ;
@U.Pref.YES@@U.CIRCUM.YES@3pl:@U.Pref.YES@@U.CIRCUM.YES@mu- SetBFunction ;

LEXICON SetBFunction
@U.TV.YES@@U.NOM.NO@.subj-:@U.TV.YES@@U.NOM.NO@ TVstems ; ! TV incompletive and contrastive
@U.TV.YES@@U.NOM.YES@.poss-:@U.TV.YES@@U.NOM.YES@ TVstems ; !TV Verbal nouns
@U.NOM.YES@@U.VERB.YES@.poss-:@U.NOM.YES@@U.VERB.YES@ IVclass ; ! IV Verbal nouns
@U.NOM.YES@@U.VERB.NO@@U.VAR.NO@@U.DERIV.NO@.poss-:@U.NOM.YES@@U.VERB.NO@@U.VAR.NO@@U.DERIV.NO@ ANsubclasses ; ! Alienable nouns
@U.NOM.YES@@U.VAR.YES@.poss-:@U.NOM.YES@@U.VAR.YES@ VariableNstems ; ! Variable nouns
@U.NOM.YES@@U.VERB.NO@@U.VAR.NO@@U.DERIV.YES@.subj-:@U.NOM.YES@@U.VERB.NO@@U.VAR.NO@@U.DERIV.YES@ ANsubclasses ; ! Alienable nouns

LEXICON SetC !IV completive aspect
@U.Pref.YES@@U.NOM.NO@@U.CIRCUM.NO@1sg.comp-:@U.Pref.YES@@U.NOM.NO@@U.CIRCUM.NO@ɨn- IVclass ;
@U.Pref.YES@@U.NOM.NO@@U.CIRCUM.NO@2sg.comp-:@U.Pref.YES@@U.NOM.NO@@U.CIRCUM.NO@ka- IVclass ;
@U.Pref.YES@@U.NOM.NO@@U.CIRCUM.NO@3sg.comp-:@U.Pref.YES@@U.NOM.NO@@U.CIRCUM.NO@%0- IVclass ;
@U.Pref.YES@@U.NOM.NO@@U.CIRCUM.NO@1pl.comp-:@U.Pref.YES@@U.NOM.NO@@U.CIRCUM.NO@muk- IVclass ;
@U.Pref.YES@@U.NOM.NO@@U.CIRCUM.YES@2pl.comp-:@U.Pref.YES@@U.NOM.NO@@U.CIRCUM.YES@ka- IVclass ;
@U.Pref.YES@@U.NOM.NO@@U.CIRCUM.YES@3pl.comp-:@U.Pref.YES@@U.NOM.NO@@U.CIRCUM.YES@%0- IVclass ;

LEXICON SetD !IV incompletive aspect
@U.Pref.YES@@U.NOM.NO@@U.CIRCUM.NO@1sg.incomp-:@U.Pref.YES@@U.NOM.NO@@U.CIRCUM.NO@ɨn- IVclass ;
@U.Pref.YES@@U.NOM.NO@@U.CIRCUM.NO@2sg.incomp-:@U.Pref.YES@@U.NOM.NO@@U.CIRCUM.NO@ka- IVclass ;
@U.Pref.YES@@U.NOM.NO@@U.CIRCUM.NO@3sg.incomp-:@U.Pref.YES@@U.NOM.NO@@U.CIRCUM.NO@a- IVclass ;
@U.Pref.YES@@U.NOM.NO@@U.CIRCUM.NO@1pl.incomp-:@U.Pref.YES@@U.NOM.NO@@U.CIRCUM.NO@muk- IVclass ;
@U.Pref.YES@@U.NOM.NO@@U.CIRCUM.YES@2pl.incomp-:@U.Pref.YES@@U.NOM.NO@@U.CIRCUM.YES@ka- IVclass ;
@U.Pref.YES@@U.NOM.NO@@U.CIRCUM.YES@3pl.incomp-:@U.Pref.YES@@U.NOM.NO@@U.CIRCUM.YES@a- IVclass ;

LEXICON SetE !Possession for inalienable nouns
@U.ADJ.NO@@U.Pref.NO@@U.ALIEN.NO@-1sg.poss:@U.ADJ.NO@@U.Pref.NO@@U.ALIEN.NO@-n' # ;
@U.ADJ.NO@@U.Pref.NO@@U.ALIEN.NO@-2sg.poss:@U.ADJ.NO@@U.Pref.NO@@U.ALIEN.NO@-ka' # ;
@U.ADJ.YES@@U.Pref.NO@@U.ALIEN.NO@-3sg.poss:@U.ADJ.YES@@U.Pref.NO@@U.ALIEN.NO@-h # ;
@U.ADJ.NO@@U.Pref.NO@@U.ALIEN.NO@-1pl.poss:@U.ADJ.NO@@U.Pref.NO@@U.ALIEN.NO@-k # ;
@U.ADJ.NO@@U.Pref.NO@@U.ALIEN.NO@-2pl.poss:@U.ADJ.NO@@U.Pref.NO@@U.ALIEN.NO@-ka% ay # ;
@U.ADJ.NO@@U.Pref.NO@@U.ALIEN.NO@-3pl.poss:@U.ADJ.NO@@U.Pref.NO@@U.ALIEN.NO@-h% lhik # ;
# ;

!Noun specific affixes

LEXICON Diminutive
@U.DIM.YES@@U.ALIEN.YES@dim-:@U.DIM.YES@@U.ALIEN.YES@chu- Alienable ;
@U.DIM.YES@@U.ALIEN.NO@dim-:@U.DIM.YES@@U.ALIEN.NO@chu- Inalienable ;

LEXICON Number
.sg:0 SetE ;
-pl:-lh%{F%} SetE ;

!IV specfic affixes
LEXICON IVclassmarker
@U.ActIV.YES@-act:@U.ActIV.YES@-lha' Personcircumfixes ;
@U.ActIV.NO@-aff:@U.ActIV.NO@-' Personcircumfixes ;

LEXICON IVImperative
@U.Pref.NO@-imp.iv:@U.Pref.NO@-y'a Personcircumfixes ;

LEXICON TVImperative
-imp.tv:-ki' Personcircumfixes ;

LEXICON IntransitiveDERIV
-inch:-k'%{F%} Personcircumfixes ;

!Circumfix elements for pronominal plural prefixes
LEXICON Personcircumfixes
@U.CIRCUM.YES@:@U.CIRCUM.YES@% ay # ;
@U.CIRCUM.NO@ # ;
